src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON adjectives
а% вейкеть+A:а% вейкеть A_VEJKET1-PL  "" ;
а% кенериця+A:а% кенериця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% кунсолыця+A:а% кунсолыця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% мариця+A:а% мариця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% неиця+A:а% неиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% пелиця+A:а% пелиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% удыця+A:а% удыця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
а% якиця+A:а% якиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
акирдевикс+A:акирдевикс A_OSH  "" ;
апак% ёмавт+A:апак% ёмавт A_KIT  "" ;
арась+A:арась A_OSH  "" ;
археологической+A:археологической A_RU-OJ  "" ;
атантей+A:а#тантей A_KEL1  "" ;
ашижа+A:ашижа A_KUDO  "" ;
аштикс+A:аштикс A_OSH  "" ;
берянь+A:берянь A_KEL1  "huono" ;
бойка+A:бойка A_KUDO  "nopea" ;
ботанической+A:ботанической A_RU-OJ  "" ;
бульдёр+A:бульдёр A_KAL  "" ;
бухляк+A:бухляк A_LAK  "" ;
валакавт+A:валакавт A_KIT  "" ;
валдо+A:валд A_PANGO  "valoisa" ;
вальмасельме+A:вальма#сельм A_TINGE  "" ;
вацев+A:вацев A_LAV  "" ;
веженсь+A:веженсь A_KEL1  "" ;
вейкеть+A:вейкеть A_VEJKET1-PL  "" ;
велень-сядонь+A:велень-сядонь A-IS-GEN  "kyläyhteisön" ;
верек+A:верек A_LAK  "kostea" ;
вереть-алот+A:вереть-алот A_KIT  "" ;
верка+A:верка A_KUDO  "nopea" ;
верьгизсельме+A:верьгизсельм A_TINGE  "" ;
виде-паро+A:виде-пар A_PANGO  "" ;
вить+A:вить A_KIT  "oikea" ;
гогосельме+A:гогосельм A_TINGE  "" ;
дальневосточной+A:дальневосточной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
дёкуш+A:дёкуш A_OSH  "" ;
здоровый+A:здоровый A_KEL1  "" ;
зелёна+A:зелёна A_KUDO  "" ;
идем+A:идем A_KAL  "" ;
изволок+A:изволок A_LAK  "" ;
икельсть-удалсть+A:икельсть-удалсть A_KIT  "" ;
икрав+A:икрав A_LAV  "" ;
инзенской+A:инзенской A_RU-OJ  "" ;
касиян+A:касиян A_KAL  "" ;
кевсельме+A:кевсельм A_TINGE  "" ;
кежей+A:кежей A_KEL1  "vihainen" ;
кечказов+A:кечказов A_LAV  "" ;
кивесельме+A:кивесельм A_TINGE  "" ;
клёш+A:клёш A_OSH  "" ;
комавтонь+A:комавтонь A-IS-GEN  "" ;
крёстной+A:крёстной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
кузсельме+A:кузсельм A_TINGE  "" ;
кутёв+A:кутёв A_LAV  "" ;
кучт+A:кучт A_KIT  "" ;
кяньштимя+A:кяньштимя A_KUDO  "" ;
лавськурго+A:лавськург A_PANGO  "" ;
лавшо+A:лавш A_PANGO  "heikko" ;
ладорман+A:ладорман A_KAL  "" ;
ламбамо+A:ламбам A_PANGO  "makea" ;
лембе-валдо+A:лембе-валд A_PANGO  "" ;
лецяк+A:лецяк A_LAK  "" ;
ловсос+A:ловсос A_OSH  "" ;
лутшэй+A:лутшэй A_KEL1  "" ;
мазутов+A:мазутов A_LAV  "" ;
мейсельме+A:мейсельм A_TINGE  "" ;
мельс% каявиця+A:мельс% каявиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
монополиянь+A:монополиянь A-IS-GEN  "monopolistinen" ;
наждачной+A:наждачной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
наракш+A:наракш A_OSH  "leikkotukkainen" ;
начко+A:начк A_PANGO  "kostea" ;
невольниця+A:невольниця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
нерушимый+A:нерушимый A_KEL1  "" ;
нолов+A:нолов A_LAV  "" ;
ношка% преве+A:ношка% преве A_KUDO  "" ;
нупоненг+A:нупоненг A_KAL  "" ;
нюрначко+A:нюрначк A_PANGO  "" ;
ордакш+A:ордакш A_OSH  "" ;
отёр+A:отёр A_KAL  "" ;
панок+A:панок A_LAK  "" ;
парфюмерной+A:парфюмерной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
пезьгуналов+A:пезьгуналов A_LAV  "" ;
пельсверек+A:пельсверек A_LAK  "" ;
пельсначко+A:пельсначк A_PANGO  "" ;
петь+A:петь A_KIT  "" ;
пижиксна+A:пижиксна A_KUDO  "" ;
письверек+A:пись#верек A_LAK  "" ;
полдарь+A:полдарь A_KEL1  "" ;
полдасельме+A:полдасельм A_TINGE  "" ;
превтеме+A:превтеме A_KAL  "" ;
принципиальной+A:принципиальной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
пупав+A:пупав A_LAV  "" ;
рисэнь+A:рисэнь A-IS-GEN  "riisi-" ;
связной+A:связной A_RU-OJ  "" ;
серый+A:серый A_KEL1  "" ;
слюнав+A:слюнав A_LAV  "" ;
созма+A:созма A_KUDO  "" ;
сокор+A:сокор A_KAL  "" ;
сувсельме+A:сувсельм A_TINGE  "" ;
сюлмонг+A:сюлмонг A_KAL  "" ;
сялговтовикс+A:сялговтовикс A_OSH  "" ;
сярдажов+A:сярдажов A_LAV  "" ;
сёвонень+A:сёвонень A-IS-GEN  "savinen" ;
сёрмат-сёрмат+A:сёрмат-сёрмат A_KIT  "" ;
тарть+A:тарть A_KIT  "" ;
ташто+A:ташт A_CHUVTO  "vanha" ;
телешовской+A:телешовской A_RU-OJ  "" ;
товолдонь+A:товолдонь A-IS-GEN  "tuolta oleva" ;
тупажа+A:тупажа A_KUDO  "" ;
тупиця+A:тупиця ActDemPrc-A  "" ;
тусто+A:туст A_CHUVTO  "tiheä" ;
тушто-ташто+A:тушто-ташт A_CHUVTO  "" ;
тюжт+A:тюжт A_KIT  "" ;
тюря% начко+A:тюря% начк A_PANGO  "" ;
укшторонь+A:укшторонь A-IS-GEN  "" ;
футболонь+A:футболонь A-IS-GEN  "jalkapallo-" ;
храбрый+A:храбрый A_KEL1  "" ;
целанек+A:целанек A_LAK  "" ;
цемстрой+A:цемстрой A_RU-OJ  "" ;
цикор+A:цикор A_KAL  "" ;
цёлак+A:цёлак A_LAK  "" ;
чанстев+A:чанстев A_LAV  "" ;
чевте+A:чевть A_TESHTE  "pehmeä" ;
чиютконь+A:чиютконь A-IS-GEN  "" ;
штань+A:штань A-IS-GEN  "" ;
перть+A:перть A_KIT  "" ;
экше+A:экш A_TINGE  "viileä" ;
эрек+A:эрек A_LAK  "" ;
эчкине+A:эчкине A_KUDO  "" ;
явовикс+A:явовикс A_OSH  "" ;
якштерь+A:якштерь A_KEL1  "" ;
ятонь+A:ятонь A-IS-GEN  "" ;
ён+A:ён A_KAL  "hyvä" ;
ёрок+A:ёрок A_LAK  "" ;
